Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,103
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act, how cited.

Sections 71-24,103 to 71-24,105 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 437, § 1.

Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, see section 71-24,106.